New York, session 2025-2026, S7842.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil service law is amended by adding a new section 2 137 to read as follows: 3 § 137. Managerial or confidential location pay differential. Notwith- 4 standing any provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the 5 state civil service commission shall design and implement a pilot 6 location pay compensation program for state employees designated manage- 7 rial or confidential that is based upon cost-of-living factors in 8 different geographic areas of the state consistent with methodologies 9 used by the federal government in its general schedule locality pay 10 plan. The pilot program shall begin on the first of April next succeed- 11 ing the effective date of this section, and have a duration of three 12 fiscal years. No such pilot program shall reduce current location pay 13 compensation amounts to any current or future state employee designated 14 managerial or confidential. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 16 the date on which it shall have become a law and shall expire and be 17 deemed repealed 4 years after such date. Effective immediately, the 18 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 19 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 20 to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11978-01-5